District of Columbia statutes.
38-241

Truancy and Dropout Prevention Program.

(a)

Subject to the availability of appropriations, the District of Columbia Board of Education, or its successor, and the District of Columbia Public Schools shall offer a Truancy and Dropout Prevention Program for students who are enrolled in the District of Columbia Public Schools system. The programs should be implemented on a full-time basis, work with local schools and parents, and provide resources that will help reduce absences and unexcused absences, and reduce dropout and increase retention rates.

(b)

The program shall develop a supportive relationship with the Metropolitan Police Department.

(c)

The program shall be available for students who are enrolled in grades K-12 and for students who are enrolled in ungraded classes in elementary, middle or junior high, and high schools.

(d)

Notwithstanding any other law, nothing in this section shall be construed to create an entitlement to a truancy or dropout prevention program for any student.

March 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1202, 45 DCR 7193
1981 Ed., § 31-471.
1981 Ed., § 31-1861.
2001 Ed., § 38-252.
For temporary addition of subchapter see § 802 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 802 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
District of Columbia Public Schools Truancy and Dropout Prevention Program Act of 1998: Section 1201 of D.C. Law 12-175 provided that title XII of the act may be cited as the “District of Columbia Public Schools Truancy and Dropout Prevention Program Act of 1998.”